Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-302.01
Access aisle, defined.

Access aisle means a space adjacent to a handicapped parking space or passenger loading zone which is constructed and designed in compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and the federal regulations adopted in response to the act, as the act and the regulations existed on the date specified in section 60-201.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 11;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 12;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 12.